District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.16

Annual report by Superintendent.

The Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail shall annually, in the month of November, make a detailed report to the Attorney General.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1379, ch. 854, § 1197
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
1981 Ed., § 24-416.
1973 Ed., § 24-416.